Tennessee, session 114, HB0855.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 2-3-107(c), is amended by adding
the following to the end of the subsection:
When negotiating for the use of private buildings as polling places, the county
election commission shall inquire as to whether the private building may be used
free of charge.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB0855
002905
- 1 -